Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8A, Chapter 23J, of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following words:- “No
offshore wind company shall be eligible to be deemed a certified offshore wind company
pursuant to subsection (b) without first submitting to the center evidence of an executed producer
responsibility agreement, signed under the pains and penalties of perjury by a person expressly
authorized to contract on behalf of the offshore wind company.”
of 1